Mississippi, session 2026, SB3339.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Town of Bruce, Mississippi, for the purpose of defraying costs associated with certain infrastructure projects for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.... $ 2,900,000.00. SECTION 2.  Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of Section 1 of this act, the following amounts are to be allocated as follows: To defray costs of improvements and upgrades to both of its parks............ $   100,000.00 To defray costs of construction of the town's police department............. $ 1,000,000.00 To defray costs of the acquisition of generators for the water and sewer systems........................... $ 150,000.00 To defray costs of city square improvements............................ $ 125,000.00 To defray costs of upgrades and repairs to the city water system.................................. $ 450,000.00 To defray costs of the acquisition of a fire truck for the town's fire department......................... $ 750,000.00 To defray costs of repairs and upgrades................................ $ 75,000.00 To defray costs of repairs and upgrades to the town's sewer system............................ $ 250,000.00 SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.